Utah statutes.
63B-1-202.   Bond legislation to contain operation cost estimates of funded projects.

(1)  As used in this section, "capital projects" means buildings but does not include highways, roads, or capital improvements to buildings.

(2)  All legislation authorizing the commission to issue bonds for the acquisition and construction of capital projects shall contain an estimate of the annual amount of funds necessary to operate and maintain each capital project.

(3)  If any operations and maintenance costs estimates required by this section are omitted from any legislation authorizing the commission to issue bonds, that omission does not affect the authority of the commission to issue bonds.

